Colorado, session 2026A, HB1022.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
Shading denotes HOUSE amendment. Double underlining denotes SENATE amendment.
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material to be added to existing law.
Dashes through the words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law.

SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-71-119.5, add
(2.7) as follows:
13-71-119.5. Persons entitled to be excused from or to opt out
of jury service - temporary or permanent.
(2.7) (a) (I) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, A JUDGE OR JURY
COMMISSIONER OF THE COURT TO WHICH A PERSON IS SUMMONED FOR
JURY SERVICE SHALL ALLOW A PERSON WHO IS SEVENTY-TWO YEARS OLD
OR OLDER, AS OF THE BEGINNING DATE OF JURY SERVICE STATED ON THE
JUROR SUMMONS, TO TEMPORARILY OPT OUT OF JURY SERVICE IF THE
PERSON REQUESTS TO TEMPORARILY OPT OUT OF JURY SERVICE.
(II) A PERSON WHO TEMPORARILY OPTS OUT PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (2.7)(a) IS ELIGIBLE FOR JUROR QUALIFICATION WHEN THE
TEMPORARY OPT-OUT EXPIRES, AS DETERMINED BY THE COURT.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2.7)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, A JUDGE OR JURY COMMISSIONER OF THE
COURT TO WHICH A PERSON IS SUMMONED FOR JURY SERVICE SHALL
ALLOW A PERSON WHO IS SEVENTY-TWO YEARS OLD OR OLDER, AS OF THE
BEGINNING DATE OF JURY SERVICE STATED ON THE JUROR SUMMONS, TO
PERMANENTLY OPT OUT OF JURY SERVICE IF THE PERSON REQUESTS TO
PERMANENTLY OPT OUT OF JURY SERVICE.
(c) THE JUDGE OR JURY COMMISSIONER OF THE COURT TO WHICH
A PERSON IS SUMMONED FOR JURY SERVICE MAY REQUIRE THE PERSON
WHO REQUESTS EITHER A TEMPORARY OR PERMANENT OPT-OUT FROM
JURY SERVICE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2.7) TO PROVIDE A
DOCUMENT DEMONSTRATING PROOF OF THEIR AGE. A DOCUMENT
PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2.7) IS NOT A PUBLIC RECORD
AND MUST NOT BE DISCLOSED TO THE PUBLIC.
-2- HB26-1022

(d) A PERSON WHO REQUESTS A TEMPORARY OR PERMANENT
OPT-OUT FROM JURY SERVICE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2.7) SHALL
TAKE ALL ACTIONS NECESSARY TO OBTAIN A DETERMINATION REGARDING
THE REQUEST BEFORE THE BEGINNING DATE OF JURY SERVICE STATED ON
THE JUROR SUMMONS.
(e) SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON
WHO TEMPORARILY OR PERMANENTLY OPTS OUT OF JURY SERVICE
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2.7)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-3- HB26-1022